Utah statutes.
78B-5-302.   Definition -- Filing and status of foreign judgments.
(1)  As used in this part, "foreign judgment" means any judgment, decree, or
order of a court of the United States or of any other court whose acts are
entitled to full faith and credit in this state.
(2)  A copy of a foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with an
appropriate act of Congress or an appropriate act of Utah may be filed with
the clerk of any district court in Utah.  The clerk of the district court
shall treat the foreign judgment in all respects as a judgment of a district
court of Utah.
(3)  A foreign judgment filed under this part has the same effect and is
subject to the same procedures, defenses, enforcement, satisfaction, and
proceedings for reopening, vacating, setting aside, or staying as a judgment
of a district court of this state.
